Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 13. Mine Subsidence Loss Insurance

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, (2nd Ed.) §
172.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-11-1301.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Administrator” means the administrator of the abandoned mine land division of the department of environmental quality;

“Mine subsidence loss” means loss caused by lateral or vertical movement, including collapse which results therefrom, of structures from collapse of man-made underground mines or from collapse of underground cavities resulting from burned coal seams but excludes loss caused by underground water, soil expansion, earthquake, landslide, volcanic eruption or collapse of storm or sewer drains or underground pipelines;

“Structure” means any dwelling, building or fixture, publicly or privately owned, permanently affixed to realty but excludes land, trees, plants and crops;

“This act” means W.S.

35-11-1301

through

35-11-1304

.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 85, § 1; 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-11-1302.
Mine subsidence loss insurance program; established; rulemaking authority.

The governor shall establish an insurance program to cover mine subsidence loss to specified structures in this state. The program shall be operated by the director of the department of environmental quality through the administrator who shall contract for all services related to advertising, sales of the coverage and claims adjustment and may contract for other services necessary to the efficient operation of the program. The program shall cover all structures insured under this act for mine subsidence damage occurring after the effective date of the coverage, consistent with the contract terms and conditions. The program shall also cover structures which have been damaged before the effective date of this act, provided that:

Damage to the structures was caused by subsidence of mine voids in the number one and seven coal seams in Rock Springs, Wyoming;

Claims made to the administrator documenting that initial subsidence damage was suffered on or about the dates of August 15, August 21, September 4 or September 10, 1985;

The property owner has made application for coverage under this act, paid the premium required by the administrator and paid an enrollment fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00);

The property owner executes and delivers instruments and papers and does whatever else is necessary to secure rights in the state to be subrogated to all the owner’s right of recovery against any person, entity or organization for the damage and loss covered under this act; and

Claims for damages and loss covered under this act and filed under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act [1-39-101 et seq.] are withdrawn.

The governor may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to establish and operate a mine subsidence loss insurance program under this act, including but not limited to:

Contract terms and conditions;

Deductibles;

Coverage limits;

Claims adjustment procedures;

Premium rates and enrollment fees sufficient to:

Cover administrative expenses of the program including service contracts;

Satisfy anticipated claims from mine subsidence loss;

Establish a surplus to cover catastrophic hazard and to ensure solvency.

Designation of structures or areas for which coverage shall not be available;

Inspection of structures prior to issuing insurance coverage;

Rules or regulations necessary to enable the state to qualify for federal grants for state mine subsidence loss insurance programs.

The governor may accept grants from any source to aid in establishing or operating the program under this act.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 85, § 1; 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used to in this section, see § 35-11-1301(a)(iv).

§ 35-11-1303.
Applicability of Wyoming Insurance Code; exemption.

The Wyoming Insurance Code applies to transactions under this act except:

The state and its officers, agencies and employees are exempt from the licensing, financial and tax requirements imposed by chapters 3, 4, 6, 7 and 8 of the Wyoming Insurance Code;

Any person who contracts with the state to transact insurance under this act is subject to the Wyoming Insurance Code as if the state were an insurer with a certificate of authority to transact the insurance in this state.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 85, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-1301(a)(iv).

Insurance Code. —

See §§

26-1-101

and 26-1-102(a)(xxxii).

§ 35-11-1304.
Account created; premiums to be deposited; payment of expenses and claims.

There is created a mine subsidence loss insurance account. All premiums, fees, amounts recovered under the program and, where appropriate, grants shall be deposited into this account. The legislature shall authorize expenditures by appropriation from the account as necessary to defray the administrative expenses of the program but not claims for losses under policies. The remaining funds in the account shall be used and are appropriated to pay claims for losses under insurance policies under this act.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 85, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the enterprise fund” in the first sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-1301(a)(iv).

Liability of state. —

Laws 1986, ch. 85, § 2, provides: “The liability of the state of Wyoming for claims under policies issued under this act is limited to the amount of funds available in the account established under this section. No coverage under this act shall be sold until the state has qualified for a grant of federal funds to operate the program.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”